Hawaii, session 2026, GM1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii's permitting
process has long been a source of frustration for residents,
developers, and government agencies. High vacancy rates,
outdated systems, and fragmented workflows have led to
significant delays in housing and infrastructure development.
Recent legislative actions have attempted to address permitting
delays, including Act 295, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, which
established requirements and procedures for permit applicants to
apply for an expedited permit if sixty days have lapsed after a
permit application was deemed complete by a relevant agency, and
Act 133, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, which established the
Simplifying Permitting for Enhanced Economic Development task
force to identify legislative measures necessary to facilitate,
expedite, and coordinate state and intergovernmental development
permit processes. The legislature believes that additional
reform is urgently needed.
2026-2349 SB2671 GDI SMA.docx
iiHHiiHiiniiiiiiHni

Page 2
S.B. NO. s" ’
C.D. 1
The legislature further finds that one proven strategy to
improve recruitment and retention for hard-to-fill government
roles is offering differential pay. The department of education
implemented shortage differentials of up to $10,000 for special
education, Hawaiian immersion, and other hard-to-staff teaching
positions. These incentives led to a thirty-five per cent
reduction in unlicensed special education teachers and
significantly improved staffing stability. Similar models have
been used in other departments and bargaining units to address
workforce shortages.
In addition, the governor's operation hire Hawaii
initiative has actively tackled personnel challenges across
state agencies by promoting expedited hiring and workforce
equity.
Establishing a pilot program that empowers counties to
streamline permitting operations through targeted staffing,
performance incentives, and interdepartmental coordination will
build on those successes.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to improve the
speed, accountability, and quality of permit processing in
county departments by authorizing the mayor of each county to
2026-2349 SB2671 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiBimiHiiiiiiiiiifflnii

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
implement a pilot program that targets staffing, performance
incentives, and interdepartmental competition.
SECTION 2. (a) The mayor of any county may implement a
pilot program to improve the speed, accountability, and quality
of permit processing within that county through targeted
staffing, performance incentives, and interdepartmental
competition. The pilot program shall be implemented as an
experimental modernization project pursuant to section 78-3.5,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, and the purposes, methodology,
duration, and criteria for evaluation developed pursuant to
section 78-3.5 (b) (1), Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be
consistent with this Act.
(b) Any pilot program implemented pursuant to subsection
(a) shall operate for four fiscal years, beginning July 1, 2026,
and shall ensure that:
(1) The mayor of a county participating in the pilot
program may designate any number of positions in
departments involved in permit review or permit
processing, or both, as essential permitting
positions;
2026-2349 SB2671 CDl SMA.docx
iMnuiiiiiinniiiiiiiiiii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Each position designated as an essential permitting
position shall receive a minimum differential payment
equal to fifteen per cent of the position's salary;
provided that an agency may increase the amount of the
differential payment above fifteen per cent of the
position's salary if the mayor deems it necessary to
recruit or retain necessary workers in essential
permitting positions;
(3) Persons may be hired into essential permitting
positions at salaries above the minimum salary within
the approved salary range for the purpose of
attracting qualified candidates; and
(4) Personnel departments shall prioritize the hiring of
individuals for essential permitting positions over
the hiring for other positions. A personnel
department shall make a conditional offer to
candidates qualified for essential permitting
positions within fourteen days of the date on which
the candidate was interviewed by the county.
(c) A county that participates in the pilot program
pursuant to this Act shall designate and set aside moneys for:
2026-2349 SB2671 CDl SMA.docx 4
IIHIMIMMINIIIffl

Page 5
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) Differential payments pursuant to subsection (b)(2);
(2) The hiring of new employees for essential permitting
positions; and
(3) Financial awards for meeting milestone goals, as
provided in subsection (e).
Notwithstanding any provision of section 46-16.8, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, or any charter provision, ordinance, or other law to
the contrary, moneys collected from the county surcharge on
state tax and distributed to each participating county with a
population of less than five hundred thousand pursuant to
sections 46-16.8 and 237-8.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, may be
appropriated and allocated by a participating county to fulfill
the requirements of this subsection and fund the positions
subject to the pilot program.
(d) The mayor of a county participating in the pilot
program pursuant to this Act shall establish a countywide goal
that describes the specific metrics by which the county intends
to improve permitting times by participating in the pilot
program.
(e) In addition to the countywide goal in subsection (d),
each participating county agency that participates in the pilot
2026-2349 SB2671 CDl SMA.docx
HiiniiiigiiniHiiiin

Page 6
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
program shall establish four milestone goals that describe the
specific metrics by which the agency aims to improve permitting
efficiency. The milestone goals may include reducing average
review times by a specific amount of time or increasing
throughput by a specific amount.
Upon achieving each milestone goal, designated agency
personnel shall receive financial awards pursuant to subsection
(c) of at least three per cent of the person's annual salary, as
determined by the county; provided that the county may pay a
financial award greater than three per cent. The county agency
shall designate the specific employees or classes of employees
who shall be eligible for the financial awards.
(f) Each county agency that participates in the pilot
program shall submit quarterly reports to the county council on
the agency's progress in achieving the performance metrics
described in subsections (d) and (e).
(g) Each participating county shall establish or designate
a single position to serve as the countywide permitting program
coordinator. The duties of the permitting program coordinator
shall include:
2026-2349 SB2671 CDl SMA.docx 6
MllliMnillllMHniMilll

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Overseeing and facilitating permit workflow across
departments;
(2) Troubleshooting to resolve bottlenecks and
interdepartmental issues;
(3) Serving as a liaison among stakeholders, including
applicants, reviewers, inspectors, and department
heads;
(4) Ensuring that milestone goals established pursuant to
subsection (e) are tracked and reported accurately;
and
(5) Submitting annual reports to the legislature no later
than twenty days prior to the convening of each
regular session. The annual reports shall include:
(A) Any recommended adjustments to the pilot program;
(B) Recommendations for pilot program expansion based
on pilot program outcomes; and
(C) Any other findings and recommendations, including
any proposed legislation.
(h) The pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30,
2030, unless the pilot program is extended by the legislature.
2026-2349 SB2671 CDl SMA.docx 7
iminiimiiiiniiiiiii

Pages 2671
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(i) For the purposes of this section, "essential
permitting position" means a position designated by a mayor as a
position that is essential for the review of permits, processing
of permits, or both, pursuant to subsection (b)(1). "Essential
permitting position" includes vacant positions and existing
positions that are currently filled.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2349 SB2671 CDl SMA.docx 8
MMIIIHHHIIIIIIBnilllll

S.B. NO. 22*1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2671, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
191-26

SB No. 2671, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives